Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB909.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 2303-A(d) of the act of April 9, 1929 (P.L.177, No.175), known as The Administrative Code of 1929, is amended, subsection (a) is amended by adding paragraphs and the 12345678910111213141516171819202122232425262728 section is amended by adding a subsection to read:Section 2303-A. Regulatory flexibility during opioid epidemic.(a) Suspension.--The following regulations are suspended during an opioid epidemic, as provided under subsection (c):* * *(2.1) 28 Pa. Code § 704.7(b)(6) insofar as the regulation precludes an individual who meets any of the following qualifications from serving as a counselor:(i) Contingent upon a clinical supervisor's assessment and approval, an individual:(A) with lived experience with alcohol or drug addiction and recovery;(B) with at least one year of experience working in a facility licensed by the Department of Drug and Alcohol Programs; and(C) who has an individualized training plan developed and approved by the individual's clinical supervisor or has completed the training requirements under 28 Pa. Code § 704.11 (relating to staff development program).(ii) Contingent upon a clinical supervisor's assessment and approval, an individual:(A) with at least one year of experience working in an internship or apprenticeship program in a facility licensed by the Department of Drug and Alcohol Programs; and(B) who has an individualized training plan developed and approved by the individual's clinical supervisor or has completed the training requirements under 28 Pa. Code § 704.11.20250SB0909PN1035 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 * * *(3.1) 28 Pa. Code § 704.10(b), (c) and (d) (relating to promotion of counselor assistant).* * *(b.1) Additional qualification requirements.--During an opioid epidemic as deemed to exist under subsection (c), the Department of Drug and Alcohol Programs may not promulgate or enforce any new qualification requirement, including a requirement for an individual to obtain additional credentials, for any of the positions included under 28 Pa. Code Ch. 704 (relating to staffing requirements for drug and alcohol treatment activities).* * *(d) Definitions.--As used in this section, the following words and phrases shall have the meanings given to them in this subsection unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Opioid epidemic." A public health crisis in which illicit opioid use and abuse results in more than 1,000 confirmed overdose deaths from an opioid in a calendar year over at least three consecutive years in this Commonwealth, as the number of deaths are reported by the Department of Health in the Coroner and Medical Examiner Onboarding and Drug Overdose Death Monthly Surveillance Report."Project director." The administrator of the treatment project who is responsible for the overall management of the project and staff and who meets the education and experience requirements under 28 Pa. Code Ch. 704 [(relating to staffing requirements for drug and alcohol treatment activities)].Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250SB0909PN1035 - 3 - 1234567891011121314151617181920212223242526272829